Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 3

Ferries

54-11-301. Free ferries over streams running through or bounding counties — Establishing.

A county is empowered, through its county legislative body, to establish free public ferries over any stream running through or bounding the county, at a point or points as may be determined, and to purchase and provide all necessary equipment, boats, etc., and employ labor required to operate the ferries.

Acts 1911, ch. 13, § 1; Shan., § 1720a3; Code 1932, § 3042; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1201.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Ferries, §§ 3, 4.

Law Reviews.

Water Rights in Tennessee (Mahlon L. Townsend), 27 Tenn. L. Rev. 557.

Cited: Whited v. State, 483 S.W.2d 594, 1972 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 331 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1972).

Collateral References. Ferries
1 et seq.

54-11-302. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 54-11-302 (Acts 1911, ch. 13, § 2; Shan., § 1720a4; Code 1932, § 3043; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1202), concerning condemnation for approaches and landings, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 9, effective July 1, 2006.

Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 25, provided that the amendment by that act shall apply only to eminent domain or condemnation proceedings initiated on or after July 1, 2006.

54-11-303. Joint ferries over streams separating counties.

It is lawful for any two (2) or more counties separated by a stream, navigable or unnavigable, to unite in the erection, establishment, and operation of a ferry over the stream, each of the counties, if not more than two (2), paying one half (½) of all the expenses incurred in the erection and maintenance.

If more than two (2) counties combine in the improvement and work, each shall pay an equal part of the expense, or they may meet the expense under terms they may provide by contract.

Acts 1911, ch. 13, § 3; Shan., § 1720a5; Code 1932, § 3044; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1203.

Cross-References. Bridges to be made by two counties, contract, §§ 54-11-203, 54-11-204.

54-11-304. Appropriations — Oversight of work under road commissioner or a special commissioner.

The counties are authorized to appropriate money for the purposes set forth in §§ 54-11-301 — 54-11-303.

The counties may place the oversight of all the work and improvement under the county road commissioners or under the road commissioner for the district in which the ferry may be situated, or under a special commissioner, and may require reports from the party or parties at any time.

Acts 1911, ch. 13, § 4; Shan., § 1720a6; Code 1932, § 3045; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1204.

54-11-305. Ferry operator — Selection and salary — Vacancy.

The county legislative body at any session may select and fix the salary of the ferry operators for ferries established under this part; however, in cases of vacancy occasioned by death or permanent disability, the county mayors are authorized to name a successor to serve until the next session.

Acts 1911, ch. 13, § 5; Shan., § 1720a7; Code 1932, § 3046; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1205; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cited: Whited v. State, 483 S.W.2d 594, 1972 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 331 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1972).

54-11-306. Free ferries and ferry roads on navigable rivers.

The county legislative body has the power to make appropriations of money for the establishment of ferries and ferry roads on any of the navigable streams of this state, and also for the construction of all proper and necessary roads, leading across the river bottom lands, and up and down the river banks to the ferries.

When the ferries and ferry roads are established, they may be declared by the legislative body free to the general public or to the citizens of the county or counties in which they are located.

Acts 1901, ch. 30, § 1; Shan., § 1720a1; Code 1932, § 3040; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1206.

54-11-307. Appropriations for operation and construction of ferries — Commissioner appointed — Duties.

The county legislative body has the power to:

Make appropriations of money, from time to time, to pay persons for operating the ferries, which they may establish;

Appoint one (1) or more persons as commissioner, to contract for the building of ferry boats, construction of roads, and to do any other thing necessary for the construction of all proper roads and the establishment of the ferries contemplated by this part; and

Make the necessary appropriations of moneys for the payment for the building of ferry boats and construction of roads.

Acts 1901, ch. 30, § 2; Shan., § 1720a2; Code 1932, § 3041; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1207.

54-11-308. Commissioner of transportation authorized to acquire and operate ferries connecting state roads — Operation of other ferries limited.

The commissioner of transportation has the power to acquire by donation, purchase, or exercise of the power of eminent domain under the general law the assets of any ferry service business operating as a connection between state roads and is authorized to operate the business as a function of the department.

The department may continue to operate any ferries now operated by the department, but in the future shall only operate ferries connecting state roads.

The department may discontinue any ferry service business when it is no longer financially feasible, on reasonable public notice, except the department shall continue to operate the Cumberland City ferry or, in the alternative, arrange for and cause to be implemented another method for its continued operation by another public body.

The commissioner shall charge reasonable tolls for the use of a ferry service business based on a user classification schedule. School buses and state and county vehicles shall be exempt from the payment of the toll. The fee charges that are established for the Cumberland City ferry shall provide that the fee shall not exceed seventy-five cents (75¢) per day for local residents who use the ferry.

As used in subdivision (d)(1), “local residents” includes residents of Stewart, Montgomery, and Houston counties.

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013.]

Acts 1981, ch. 255, §§ 1-4; 1982, ch. 918, § 1; 2013, ch. 308, § 29.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment deleted (e) which read: “The commissioner is authorized to appoint advisory committees composed of three (3) citizens in the communities affected by ferry service business to make recommendations concerning the efficient operation of the ferry service.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 46. July 1, 2013.

54-11-309. Limitations on ferriage rates — Application for waivers.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), no person shall charge as ferriage on any stream on any highway included in the state highway system or maintained in whole or part by the department of transportation more than the rate fixed as follows:

Automobile and passengers $2.00

Person, each, on foot 0.50

Truck or bus (one (1) ton capacity and under) and driver 2.00

Truck or bus (one (1) ton capacity and over) and driver 4.00

Automobile trailer 1.50

Truck trailer or bus trailer 3.00

Motorcycle and driver 2.00

Upon application submitted to the department requesting a waiver of the maximum rate fixed within subsection (a), the commissioner may fix a maximum rate in excess of that fixed within subsection (a). Any maximum rate fixed by the commissioner pursuant to this subsection (b) shall be promulgated as a rule in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. In promulgating any such rule, the commissioner shall give due consideration to:

The public's need for adequate and efficient ferriage service at a reasonable and prudent cost; and

The ferry operator's need of revenues sufficient to enable the operator, using honest, economical, and efficient management, to provide the ferriage services and to earn a reasonable profit.

Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 54-11-309 (Acts 1996, ch. 1007, § 1), concerning transfer of the ownership of the ferry at Clifton, Tennessee to Hardin County, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 11, effective July 1, 2013.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 46. July 1, 2013.